output/dictionaries/Medzuslovjansky_LatinicaEtimologicna.aff
FLAG long
SFX Ds Y 69
SFX Ds ti l .
SFX Ds ti la .
SFX Ds ti lo .
SFX Ds ti li .
SFX Ds ypěti ipjų .
SFX Ds ypěti ipim .
SFX Ds ypěti ipiš .
SFX Ds ypěti ipi .
SFX Ds ypěti ipimȯ .
SFX Ds ypěti ipite .
SFX Ds ypěti ipęt .
SFX Ds ti h .
SFX Ds ti še .
SFX Ds ti hmȯ .
SFX Ds ti ste .
SFX Ds ti hų .
SFX Ds ypěti ipęći .
SFX Ds ypěti ipęća .
SFX Ds ypěti ipęće .
SFX Ds ypěti ipimy .
SFX Ds ypěti ipimogo .
SFX Ds ypěti ipimomu .
SFX Ds ypěti ipimym .
SFX Ds ypěti ipimom .
SFX Ds ypěti ipimo .
SFX Ds ypěti ipima .
SFX Ds ypěti ipimų .
SFX Ds ypěti ipimoj .
SFX Ds ypěti ipimojų .
SFX Ds ypěti ipimi .
SFX Ds ypěti ipime .
SFX Ds ypěti ipimyh .
SFX Ds ypěti ipimym .
SFX Ds ypěti ipimymi .
SFX Ds ypěti ipimo .
SFX Ds ti vši .
SFX Ds ti všego .
SFX Ds ti všemu .
SFX Ds ti všim .
SFX Ds ti všem .
SFX Ds ti vših .
SFX Ds ti všimi .
SFX Ds ti vša .
SFX Ds ti všų .
SFX Ds ti všej .
SFX Ds ti všejų .
SFX Ds ti vše .
SFX Ds ti ny .
SFX Ds ti nogo .
SFX Ds ti nomu .
SFX Ds ti nym .
SFX Ds ti nom .
SFX Ds ti ni .
SFX Ds ti ne .
SFX Ds ti nyh .
SFX Ds ti nymi .
SFX Ds ti na .
SFX Ds ti nų .
SFX Ds ti noj .
SFX Ds ti nojų .
SFX Ds ti no .
SFX Ds ti ńje/xPxE .
SFX Ds ti ńja/xPxE .
SFX Ds ti ńju/xPxE .
SFX Ds ti ńjem/xPxE .
SFX Ds ti nij/xPxE .
SFX Ds ti ńjam/xPxE .
SFX Ds ti ńjami/xPxE .
SFX Ds ti ńjah/xPxE .

SFX Dt Y 11
SFX Dt 0 e .
SFX Dt 0 i .
SFX Dt 0 a .
SFX Dt 0 ev .
SFX Dt 0 ij .
SFX Dt 0 u .
SFX Dt 0 ah .
SFX Dt 0 am .
SFX Dt 0 em .
SFX Dt 0 jų .
SFX Dt 0 ami .

SFX Du Y 4
SFX Du 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Du 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX Du ś si/xPxE .
SFX Du 0 jų/xPxE .

SFX Dv Y 11
SFX Dv 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Dv a o/xPxBxO .
SFX Dv ȯha hy/xPxE .
SFX Dv ȯha hų/xPxE .
SFX Dv ȯha h/xPxE .
SFX Dv ȯha hě/xPxE .
SFX Dv ȯha hah/xPxE .
SFX Dv ȯha ham/xPxE .
SFX Dv ȯha hojų/xPxE .
SFX Dv ȯha hami/xPxE .
SFX Dv ȯha ho/xPxE .

SFX Dw Y 11
SFX Dw 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Dw o o/xPxBxO .
SFX Dw o a/xPxE .
SFX Dw no ȯn/xPxE .
SFX Dw o u/xPxE .
SFX Dw o ah/xPxE .
SFX Dw o am/xPxE .
SFX Dw 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Dw o ami/xPxE .
SFX Dw no en/xPxE .
SFX Dw o ju/xPxE .

SFX Dx Y 21
SFX Dx 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Dx 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX Dx ȯb b/xPxE .
SFX Dx ȯb by/xPxE .
SFX Dx 0 y/xPxE .
SFX Dx ȯb ba/xPxE .
SFX Dx 0 a/xPxE .
SFX Dx ȯb bov/xPxE .
SFX Dx 0 ov/xPxE .
SFX Dx ȯb bu/xPxE .
SFX Dx 0 u/xPxE .
SFX Dx ȯb bah/xPxE .
SFX Dx 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX Dx ȯb bam/xPxE .
SFX Dx 0 am/xPxE .
SFX Dx ȯb bom/xPxE .
SFX Dx 0 om/xPxE .
SFX Dx ȯb bami/xPxE .
SFX Dx 0 ami/xPxE .
SFX Dx ȯb be/xPxE .
SFX Dx 0 e/xPxE .

SFX Dy Y 11
SFX Dy 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Dy 0 e/xPxBxO .
SFX Dy 0 i/xPxE .
SFX Dy 0 a/xPxE .
SFX Dy 0 ov/xPxE .
SFX Dy 0 u/xPxE .
SFX Dy 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX Dy 0 am/xPxE .
SFX Dy 0 om/xPxE .
SFX Dy 0 ami/xPxE .
SFX Dy 0 e/xPxE .

SFX Dz Y 6
SFX Dz 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Dz i e/xPxBxO .
SFX Dz i ov/xPxE .
SFX Dz i ah/xPxE .
SFX Dz i am/xPxE .
SFX Dz i ami/xPxE .

SFX EA Y 78
SFX EA ti l .
SFX EA ti la .
SFX EA ti lo .
SFX EA ti li .
SFX EA vati jų .
SFX EA vati jem .
SFX EA vati ješ .
SFX EA vati je .
SFX EA vati jemȯ .
SFX EA vati jete .
SFX EA vati jųt .
SFX EA ti h .
SFX EA ti še .
SFX EA ti hmȯ .
SFX EA ti ste .
SFX EA ti hų .
SFX EA vati j .
SFX EA vati jmȯ .
SFX EA vati jte .
SFX EA vati jųći .
SFX EA vati jųćego .
SFX EA vati jųćemu .
SFX EA vati jųćim .
SFX EA vati jųćem .
SFX EA vati jųćih .
SFX EA vati jųćimi .
SFX EA vati jųća .
SFX EA vati jųće .
SFX EA vati jemy .
SFX EA vati jemogo .
SFX EA vati jemomu .
SFX EA vati jemym .
SFX EA vati jemom .
SFX EA vati jemo .
SFX EA vati jema .
SFX EA vati jemų .
SFX EA vati jemoj .
SFX EA vati jemojų .
SFX EA vati jemi .
SFX EA vati jeme .
SFX EA vati jemyh .
SFX EA vati jemym .
SFX EA vati jemymi .
SFX EA vati jemo .
SFX EA ti vši .
SFX EA ti všego .
SFX EA ti všemu .
SFX EA ti všim .
SFX EA ti všem .
SFX EA ti vših .
SFX EA ti všimi .
SFX EA ti vša .
SFX EA ti všų .
SFX EA ti všej .
SFX EA ti všejų .
SFX EA ti vše .
SFX EA ti ny .
SFX EA ti nogo .
SFX EA ti nomu .
SFX EA ti nym .
SFX EA ti nom .
SFX EA ti ni .
SFX EA ti ne .
SFX EA ti nyh .
SFX EA ti nymi .
SFX EA ti na .
SFX EA ti nų .
SFX EA ti noj .
SFX EA ti nojų .
SFX EA ti no .
SFX EA ti ńje/xPxE .
SFX EA ti ńja/xPxE .
SFX EA ti ńju/xPxE .
SFX EA ti ńjem/xPxE .
SFX EA ti nij/xPxE .
SFX EA ti ńjam/xPxE .
SFX EA ti ńjami/xPxE .
SFX EA ti ńjah/xPxE .

SFX EB Y 28
SFX EB 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EB y o/xBxPxE .
SFX EB y a/xPxE .
SFX EB y ogo/xPxE .
SFX EB y ų/xPxE .
SFX EB y oj/xPxE .
SFX EB y om/xPxE .
SFX EB y omu/xPxE .
SFX EB 0 m/xPxE .
SFX EB y ojų/xPxE .
SFX EB y i/xPxE .
SFX EB y e/xPxE .
SFX EB 0 h/xPxE .
SFX EB 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX EB ky ši/zz .
SFX EB ky šego/zz .
SFX EB ky šemu/zz .
SFX EB ky šim/zz .
SFX EB ky šem/zz .
SFX EB ky še/zz .
SFX EB ky ša/zz .
SFX EB ky šų/zz .
SFX EB ky šej/zz .
SFX EB ky šejų/zz .
SFX EB ky ših/zz .
SFX EB ky šim/zz .
SFX EB ky šimi/zz .
SFX EB tky če/xPxE .

SFX EC Y 11
SFX EC 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EC 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX EC ev jvi/xPxE .
SFX EC ev jva/xPxE .
SFX EC ev jvov/xPxE .
SFX EC ev jvu/xPxE .
SFX EC ev jvah/xPxE .
SFX EC ev jvam/xPxE .
SFX EC ev jvom/xPxE .
SFX EC ev jvami/xPxE .
SFX EC ev jve/xPxE .

SFX ED Y 78
SFX ED ti l .
SFX ED ti la .
SFX ED ti lo .
SFX ED ti li .
SFX ED gati žų .
SFX ED gati žem .
SFX ED gati žeš .
SFX ED gati že .
SFX ED gati žemȯ .
SFX ED gati žete .
SFX ED gati žųt .
SFX ED ti h .
SFX ED ti še .
SFX ED ti hmȯ .
SFX ED ti ste .
SFX ED ti hų .
SFX ED gati ži .
SFX ED gati žimȯ .
SFX ED gati žite .
SFX ED gati žųći .
SFX ED gati žųćego .
SFX ED gati žųćemu .
SFX ED gati žųćim .
SFX ED gati žųćem .
SFX ED gati žųćih .
SFX ED gati žųćimi .
SFX ED gati žųća .
SFX ED gati žųće .
SFX ED gati žemy .
SFX ED gati žemogo .
SFX ED gati žemomu .
SFX ED gati žemym .
SFX ED gati žemom .
SFX ED gati žemo .
SFX ED gati žema .
SFX ED gati žemų .
SFX ED gati žemoj .
SFX ED gati žemojų .
SFX ED gati žemi .
SFX ED gati žeme .
SFX ED gati žemyh .
SFX ED gati žemym .
SFX ED gati žemymi .
SFX ED gati žemo .
SFX ED ti vši .
SFX ED ti všego .
SFX ED ti všemu .
SFX ED ti všim .
SFX ED ti všem .
SFX ED ti vših .
SFX ED ti všimi .
SFX ED ti vša .
SFX ED ti všų .
SFX ED ti všej .
SFX ED ti všejų .
SFX ED ti vše .
SFX ED ti ny .
SFX ED ti nogo .
SFX ED ti nomu .
SFX ED ti nym .
SFX ED ti nom .
SFX ED ti ni .
SFX ED ti ne .
SFX ED ti nyh .
SFX ED ti nymi .
SFX ED ti na .
SFX ED ti nų .
SFX ED ti noj .
SFX ED ti nojų .
SFX ED ti no .
SFX ED ti ńje/xPxE .
SFX ED ti ńja/xPxE .
SFX ED ti ńju/xPxE .
SFX ED ti ńjem/xPxE .
SFX ED ti nij/xPxE .
SFX ED ti ńjam/xPxE .
SFX ED ti ńjami/xPxE .
SFX ED ti ńjah/xPxE .

SFX EE Y 28
SFX EE 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EE y o/xBxPxE .
SFX EE y a/xPxE .
SFX EE y ogo/xPxE .
SFX EE y ų/xPxE .
SFX EE y oj/xPxE .
SFX EE y om/xPxE .
SFX EE y omu/xPxE .
SFX EE 0 m/xPxE .
SFX EE y ojų/xPxE .
SFX EE y i/xPxE .
SFX EE y e/xPxE .
SFX EE 0 h/xPxE .
SFX EE 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX EE aly enši/zz .
SFX EE aly enšego/zz .
SFX EE aly enšemu/zz .
SFX EE aly enšim/zz .
SFX EE aly enšem/zz .
SFX EE aly enše/zz .
SFX EE aly enša/zz .
SFX EE aly enšų/zz .
SFX EE aly enšej/zz .
SFX EE aly enšejų/zz .
SFX EE aly enših/zz .
SFX EE aly enšim/zz .
SFX EE aly enšimi/zz .
SFX EE aly enje/zz .

SFX EF Y 13
SFX EF y-nebųď o-nebųď .
SFX EF y-nebųď a-nebųď .
SFX EF y-nebųď ogo-nebųď .
SFX EF y-nebųď ų-nebųď .
SFX EF y-nebųď oj-nebųď .
SFX EF y-nebųď om-nebųď .
SFX EF y-nebųď omu-nebųď .
SFX EF -nebųď m-nebųď .
SFX EF y-nebųď ojų-nebųď .
SFX EF y-nebųď i-nebųď .
SFX EF y-nebųď e-nebųď .
SFX EF -nebųď h-nebųď .
SFX EF -nebųď mi-nebųď .

SFX EG Y 9
SFX EG 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EG e e/xPxBxO .
SFX EG e a/xPxE .
SFX EG je ej/xPxE .
SFX EG e u/xPxE .
SFX EG e ah/xPxE .
SFX EG e am/xPxE .
SFX EG 0 m/xPxE .
SFX EG e ami/xPxE .

SFX EH Y 11
SFX EH 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EH 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX EH ȯh h/xPxE .
SFX EH ȯh ha/xPxE .
SFX EH 0 a/xPxE .
SFX EH ȯh hu/xPxE .
SFX EH 0 u/xPxE .
SFX EH ȯh hom/xPxE .
SFX EH 0 om/xPxE .
SFX EH ȯh še/xPxE .
SFX EH h še/xPxE .

SFX EI Y 69
SFX EI ti l .
SFX EI ti la .
SFX EI ti lo .
SFX EI ti li .
SFX EI ti ų .
SFX EI kti čem .
SFX EI kti češ .
SFX EI kti če .
SFX EI kti čemȯ .
SFX EI kti čete .
SFX EI ti ųt .
SFX EI kti čeh .
SFX EI kti češe .
SFX EI kti čehmȯ .
SFX EI kti česte .
SFX EI kti čehų .
SFX EI kti či .
SFX EI kti čimȯ .
SFX EI kti čite .
SFX EI ti ųći .
SFX EI ti ųćego .
SFX EI ti ųćemu .
SFX EI ti ųćim .
SFX EI ti ųćem .
SFX EI ti ųćih .
SFX EI ti ųćimi .
SFX EI ti ųća .
SFX EI ti ųće .
SFX EI kti čemy .
SFX EI kti čemogo .
SFX EI kti čemomu .
SFX EI kti čemym .
SFX EI kti čemom .
SFX EI kti čemo .
SFX EI kti čema .
SFX EI kti čemų .
SFX EI kti čemoj .
SFX EI kti čemojų .
SFX EI kti čemi .
SFX EI kti čeme .
SFX EI kti čemyh .
SFX EI kti čemym .
SFX EI kti čemymi .
SFX EI kti čemo .
SFX EI ti ši .
SFX EI ti ša .
SFX EI ti še .
SFX EI kti čeny .
SFX EI kti čenogo .
SFX EI kti čenomu .
SFX EI kti čenym .
SFX EI kti čenom .
SFX EI kti čeni .
SFX EI kti čene .
SFX EI kti čenyh .
SFX EI kti čenymi .
SFX EI kti čena .
SFX EI kti čenų .
SFX EI kti čenoj .
SFX EI kti čenojų .
SFX EI kti čeno .
SFX EI kti čeńje/xPxE .
SFX EI kti čeńja/xPxE .
SFX EI kti čeńju/xPxE .
SFX EI kti čeńjem/xPxE .
SFX EI kti čenij/xPxE .
SFX EI kti čeńjam/xPxE .
SFX EI kti čeńjami/xPxE .
SFX EI kti čeńjah/xPxE .

SFX EJ Y 78
SFX EJ ti l .
SFX EJ ti la .
SFX EJ ti lo .
SFX EJ ti li .
SFX EJ těti ćų .
SFX EJ těti ćem .
SFX EJ těti ćeš .
SFX EJ těti će .
SFX EJ těti ćemȯ .
SFX EJ těti ćete .
SFX EJ těti ćųt .
SFX EJ ti h .
SFX EJ ti še .
SFX EJ ti hmȯ .
SFX EJ ti ste .
SFX EJ ti hų .
SFX EJ těti ći .
SFX EJ těti ćimȯ .
SFX EJ těti ćite .
SFX EJ těti ćųći .
SFX EJ těti ćųćego .
SFX EJ těti ćųćemu .
SFX EJ těti ćųćim .
SFX EJ těti ćųćem .
SFX EJ těti ćųćih .
SFX EJ těti ćųćimi .
SFX EJ těti ćųća .
SFX EJ těti ćųće .
SFX EJ těti ćemy .
SFX EJ těti ćemogo .
SFX EJ těti ćemomu .
SFX EJ těti ćemym .
SFX EJ těti ćemom .
SFX EJ těti ćemo .
SFX EJ těti ćema .
SFX EJ těti ćemų .
SFX EJ těti ćemoj .
SFX EJ těti ćemojų .
SFX EJ těti ćemi .
SFX EJ těti ćeme .
SFX EJ těti ćemyh .
SFX EJ těti ćemym .
SFX EJ těti ćemymi .
SFX EJ těti ćemo .
SFX EJ ti vši .
SFX EJ ti všego .
SFX EJ ti všemu .
SFX EJ ti všim .
SFX EJ ti všem .
SFX EJ ti vših .
SFX EJ ti všimi .
SFX EJ ti vša .
SFX EJ ti všų .
SFX EJ ti všej .
SFX EJ ti všejų .
SFX EJ ti vše .
SFX EJ ti ny .
SFX EJ ti nogo .
SFX EJ ti nomu .
SFX EJ ti nym .
SFX EJ ti nom .
SFX EJ ti ni .
SFX EJ ti ne .
SFX EJ ti nyh .
SFX EJ ti nymi .
SFX EJ ti na .
SFX EJ ti nų .
SFX EJ ti noj .
SFX EJ ti nojų .
SFX EJ ti no .
SFX EJ ti ńje/xPxE .
SFX EJ ti ńja/xPxE .
SFX EJ ti ńju/xPxE .
SFX EJ ti ńjem/xPxE .
SFX EJ ti nij/xPxE .
SFX EJ ti ńjam/xPxE .
SFX EJ ti ńjami/xPxE .
SFX EJ ti ńjah/xPxE .

SFX EK Y 77
SFX EK ti l .
SFX EK ti la .
SFX EK ti lo .
SFX EK ti li .
SFX EK děti m .
SFX EK děti š .
SFX EK děti 0 .
SFX EK děti mȯ .
SFX EK děti te .
SFX EK ěti ųt .
SFX EK ti h .
SFX EK ti še .
SFX EK ti hmȯ .
SFX EK ti ste .
SFX EK ti hų .
SFX EK děti ď .
SFX EK děti ďmȯ .
SFX EK děti ďte .
SFX EK ěti ųći .
SFX EK ěti ųćego .
SFX EK ěti ųćemu .
SFX EK ěti ųćim .
SFX EK ěti ųćem .
SFX EK ěti ųćih .
SFX EK ěti ųćimi .
SFX EK ěti ųća .
SFX EK ěti ųće .
SFX EK ěti omy .
SFX EK ěti omogo .
SFX EK ěti omomu .
SFX EK ěti omym .
SFX EK ěti omom .
SFX EK ěti omo .
SFX EK ěti oma .
SFX EK ěti omų .
SFX EK ěti omoj .
SFX EK ěti omojų .
SFX EK ěti omi .
SFX EK ěti ome .
SFX EK ěti omyh .
SFX EK ěti omym .
SFX EK ěti omymi .
SFX EK ěti omo .
SFX EK ti vši .
SFX EK ti všego .
SFX EK ti všemu .
SFX EK ti všim .
SFX EK ti všem .
SFX EK ti vših .
SFX EK ti všimi .
SFX EK ti vša .
SFX EK ti všų .
SFX EK ti všej .
SFX EK ti všejų .
SFX EK ti vše .
SFX EK ti ny .
SFX EK ti nogo .
SFX EK ti nomu .
SFX EK ti nym .
SFX EK ti nom .
SFX EK ti ni .
SFX EK ti ne .
SFX EK ti nyh .
SFX EK ti nymi .
SFX EK ti na .
SFX EK ti nų .
SFX EK ti noj .
SFX EK ti nojų .
SFX EK ti no .
SFX EK ti ńje/xPxE .
SFX EK ti ńja/xPxE .
SFX EK ti ńju/xPxE .
SFX EK ti ńjem/xPxE .
SFX EK ti nij/xPxE .
SFX EK ti ńjam/xPxE .
SFX EK ti ńjami/xPxE .
SFX EK ti ńjah/xPxE .
